Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-504
State educational institutions; fees; waiver.

Rules may be made by each institution for waiving or refunding fees to students maintaining high scholarship, or to those who, maintaining satisfactory scholarship, are in need of financial assistance.

Laws 1923, c. 57, § 3, p. 178;

C.S.1929, § 85-503;

R.S.1943, § 85-504.